North Carolina statutes. Chapter 76. Navigation.
Article 1. Cape Fear River. [Repealed]

§§ 76-1 through 76-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 910, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to the Cape Fear Navigation and Pilotage Commission, see Chapter 76A.

§ 76-18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 23, s. 3.

§§ 76-19 through 76-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 910, s. 2.